Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
268

FERRIES

Section

268-1 Ferry system and facilities authorized

268-1.5 Private ferry or ferry system; authority
to provide

268-2 "Hawaii State Ferries" name
authorized

268-2.5 Intra-island water ferry transportation
system;

authority to implement

268-2.6 Ferry project special fund

268-3 Survey

268-4 Appropriation; personnel

268-5 Bonds; issue authorized

268-6 Bonds, certificates of issuance; terms and
conditions

268-7 Operation of ferry system

268-8 Fixing of charges, rates, and
disbursements of

revenues

268-9 Seamen may sue for injuries; venue

268-10 Authority as a common carrier; rights and
liabilities

268-11 Liability for damages as to persons or
property

268-12 Liability to persons other than shippers
or

passengers; limitation

268-13 Claim for damages; filing and contents;
time

limitations

268-14 Payment of claims

268-15 Venue of actions; enforcement of judgment

268-16 Report

Note

Interisland and intra-island ferry system feasibility study;
report to 2018 legislature. L 2016, c 196.

Large capacity ferry vessel requirements. L Sp 2007 2d, c 2.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next